Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-1004
Records and exhibits; preservation; disposition.

The Supreme Court shall provide by rule for the preservation of all records and of all exhibits offered or received in evidence in the trial of any action. When the records of the district court do not show any unfinished matter pending in the action, a judge of the district court if satisfied they are no longer valuable for any purpose may, upon such notice as the judge may direct, order the destruction, return, or other disposition of such exhibits as the judge deems appropriate when approval is given by the State Records Administrator pursuant to the Records Management Act.

Laws 1957, c. 75, § 1, p. 311;

Laws 1969, c. 105, § 4, p. 480;

Laws 1974, LB 647, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1985), § 24-342.01;

Laws 2020, LB1028, § 1.

Records Management Act, see section 84-1220.